Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.180.100

Continuing education plan for older students.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board for community and technical colleges shall jointly develop a program plan to provide a continuing education option for students who are eligible for the state transitional bilingual instruction program and who need more time to develop language proficiency but who are more age-appropriately suited for a postsecondary learning environment than for a high school. By December 1, 2004, the agencies shall report to the legislative education and fiscal committees with any recommendations for legislative action and any resources necessary to implement the plan.

[ 2019 c 252 s 107; 2004 c 19 s 105.]

NOTES:

Intent—2019 c 252: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.

Part headings and captions not law—Effective date—2004 c 19: See notes following RCW 28A.230.090.